hu_hu.affix
SFX M Y 426 
SFX M 0 ünkül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkön [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkévé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkével [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkétől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkét [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkére [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkénél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkének [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkén [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéiül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéiért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéivé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéivel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéitől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéit [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéiről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéire [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéinél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéinek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéin [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéiig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéihez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéiből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéiben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéibe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéi [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéhez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkéből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkében [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkébe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünké [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünktől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkre [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünknél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünknek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkként [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkké [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkkor [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkkel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkhöz [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünket [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünkbe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünk/& [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ünk [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökön [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökévé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökével [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökétől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökét [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökére [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökénél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökének [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökén [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéiül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéiért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéivé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéivel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéitől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéit [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéiről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéire [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéinél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéinek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéin [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéiig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéihez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéiből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéiben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéibe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéi [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéhez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökéből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökében [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökébe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötöké [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötöktől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökre [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötöknél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötöknek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökként [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökké [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökkor [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökkel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökhöz [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötöket [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötökbe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötök/& [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ötök [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 östül [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 önkénti/VG× [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 önként [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömön [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömévé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömével [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömétől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömét [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömére [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öménél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömének [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömén [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékévé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékével [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékétől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékét [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékére [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékénél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékének [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékén [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéiül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéiért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéivé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéivel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéitől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéit [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéiről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéire [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéinél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéinek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéin [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéiig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéihez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéiből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéiben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéibe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéi [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéhez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékéből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékében [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékébe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméké [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméktől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékre [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméknél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméknek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékké [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékkel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékhez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméket [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméken [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömékbe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömék [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméiül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméiért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméivé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméivel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméitől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméit [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméiről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméire [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméinél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméinek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméin [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméiig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméihez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméiből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméiben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméibe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméi [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméhez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öméből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömében [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömébe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömtől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömre [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömnél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömnek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömmé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömmel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömként [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömkor [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömhöz [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömet [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömben [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ömbe [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öm/& [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 öm [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökön [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökévé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökével [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökétől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökét [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökére [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökénél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökének [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökén [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéiül [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéiért [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéivé [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéivel [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéitől [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéit [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéiről [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéire [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéinél [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéinek [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéin [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéiig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéihez [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéig [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX M 0 ökéiből [^eáéiíoóöőuúüű]
