hu_hu.dict
üstök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
ük/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtvc¸˝
özön/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝l
öröm/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíłĹRYc¸Č˝lVNË×LéčÄäTtź
ősz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
évkör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
ászoksör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
állóeszköz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
Újszőny/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Ödön/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙R,¸l
zöm/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
yorkshire-i/ŃĐŐCHWMTt)	ph:jorksöri
végzendő/CÔŐŢDHWRMX)
villanyrendőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
vadőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
törzskönyv/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
töbör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
trevirakosztüm/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
tizenkétszög/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
tejföl/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
sör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
szöszmösz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
szárazgőz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
szerzendő/CÔŐŢDHWRMX)
szagosbükköny/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
segédeszköz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
rőfös/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
retikül/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
pötty/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
pézsmaökör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
plüss/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
odafönt/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l	
nullszög/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
nagyemlős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
mézsör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
montőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝l
mezőny/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
medvebőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RTtYc˝
magánkívül/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
légűr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
lelkifröccs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
külsős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
köpöly/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
köcsög/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
kézibőrönd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
kosztüm/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
kisüst/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
kikötőcölöp/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
kapuőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
jegyellenőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝l
iglicetüsök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
háztömb/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
hetvenöt/ÝWŰMRbhc
hatvankettő/ŢWŰMRbhc
hajótörött/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
görcs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
gőz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
gyöngy/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝
füstköd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
főzt/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝
főemlősök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
félkör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
forrasztóeszköz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
felelős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
fecsérlendő/CÔŐŢDHWRMX)
exminiszterelnök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
erkölcscsősz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
előfüggöny/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
elnök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
egypárevezős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
déligyümölcs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
dezertőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝l
csűr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝
csőd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝
cifraszűr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RTtYc˝
bűnügy/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
bödön/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝l
bárminemű/CŢÔŐHMWR
billentyűs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
bankkölcsön/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
aranyfüst/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
aleszköz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙TtYc˝
üdvöz/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
öntöltős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
élénkzöld/Ô×ÝGVĚNMRlą
zöldmezős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
velős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
többszörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
terjengős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
szűkös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
sietős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
rámenős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
pulykavörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
paprikavörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
nemtörődöm/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
meggyvörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
különös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
köpcös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
kitevős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
jajvörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
hátultesztelős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
görögös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
gólerős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
fölös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
esős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
elkülönült/Ô×ÝGVĚNMRlą
dicsőült/Ô×ÝGVĚNMRlą
bütykös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
buzérvörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
billentyűs/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
bauxitvörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
ZENworks/WĚŻjŘMÝÔq˙Tt,¸l	
Vértesszőlős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Tűz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸
Tótszentgyörgy/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Thewrewk/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙R,¸l
Taktaköz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Szücs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸
Szőcs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸
Strömpl/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙R,¸
Sajóörös/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Reök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙R,¸l
Prügy/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸
Nemesbőd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Mészöly/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸l
Meződ/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
M5-ös/Ô×nCHWMR)
Körös/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Kővágótöttös/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Kiskőrös/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Karakószörcsök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Iszkaszentgyörgy/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Hévízgyörk/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Hegedüs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸l
Götz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸
Gömör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Gyönk/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸
Galgagyörk/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Felsőörs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Eörs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸l
Erdős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸l
Együd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙R,¸l
Dötk/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸
Dunakömlőd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Csököly/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Csabacsűd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Börzsöny/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Bögöt/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Burjátföld/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Besenyőd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Balatongyörök/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Alsóőrs/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
5-ös/Ô×nCHWMR1)
&aring;ngström/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtvc¸˝l
